Idaho, session 2026, H0631.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-112, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-112. PROMOTION AND CERTIFICATION OF IDAHO AGRICULTURAL PROD-
UCTS. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the depart-
ment of agriculture may promulgate rules in compliance with chapter 52,
title 67, Idaho Code, for the purpose of assisting others in the domestic and
international promotion and certification of Idaho agricultural products.
Programs authorized by this section are for the purpose of promoting Idaho
agricultural products and/or to certify that Idaho agricultural products
meet required standards in order to move in commerce. Programs authorized
by this section are to be funded by the assessment of fees directly related
to the provision of voluntary services and programs authorized and provided
by rules adopted pursuant to this section. Fees assessed and collected pur-
suant to rules adopted according to this section shall be deposited in the
agricultural department inspection fund and subject to the provisions of
section 22-105, Idaho Code.
(2) Commissions, boards, associations, or other organizations au-
thorized by statute to promote or regulate agricultural products grown,
packed, or processed in the state of Idaho under pursuant to Idaho law shall
be the primary and principal promotion and certification mark and trade-
mark organizations for the particular commodity they are authorized to
promote or regulate. Any trademarks, certification marks, brands, seals,
logos or other identification marks, whether registered or not, that are
established, owned or used by such commissions, boards, associations or
organizations shall remain their sole property, and any use or infringement
of their ownership right is prohibited unless written permission is obtained
from an authorized representative of the commission, board, association or
organization.
(3) A commission, board, association or other organization referenced
in subsection (2) of this section may, upon a request to and acceptance by
the Idaho department of agriculture, participate in the promotion and certi-
fication programs administered by the department, including the payment of
fees as required by rules adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.


(4) Neither the Idaho department of agriculture, nor any agricultural
entity referenced in subsection (2) of this section, shall be responsible
for any negligent or other tortious act of the other while participating in a
joint promotional activity.
(5)(a) As used in this section, "certificate of free sale" means a cer-
tificate issued by the department of agriculture that certifies that a
product is grown or processed in Idaho, is distributed throughout the
state of Idaho, and is in accordance with Idaho health and sanitary laws
and regulations.
(b) To meet document requirements set by designation countries for
products grown or processed in Idaho, an exporter may apply for the
department to issue a certificate of free sale. The exporter appli-
cant shall be responsible for paying an application fee, which shall be
set by the department and shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).
The department may request information from the exporter applicant,
including the applicant's most recent state, federal, or third-party
health inspection records. Such records shall be kept on file with
the department for one (1) year. Issuance and receipt of a certificate
of free sale does not relieve the exporter from regulation by the de-
partment of agriculture or from adhering to applicable state laws and
regulations.
SECTION 2. The rules contained in IDAPA 02.01.05, Department of Agri-
culture, relating to the Rules Governing Certificates of Free Sale, shall be
null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.